Missouri, session 2026, HB2020.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Section 20.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For distributions to private institutions of higher education for MoExcels
Workforce Development Initiatives recommended by the
Coordinating Board for Higher Education, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 2
on a 50/50 basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the
recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$1,645,409
Section 20.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the purpose of planning and implementing technology updates for
Missouri’s job centers providing statewide services to citizens
and employers and to provide adaptive technology to service
citizens with disabilities and allow for improved virtual delivery
of services
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................................$634
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 3,244
Total ..................................................................................................................................$3,878
Section 20.013. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For grants to port authorities, provided that local match be provided in
order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$7,617,575
Section 20.014. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For grants to a port authority located in any county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two
thousand but fewer than three thousand inhabitants, provided that
local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$1,161,452
Section 20.016. To the Department of Transportation
For the design and environmental study phases for a not-for-profit
organization formed for the purpose of managing, operating, and
maintaining the streetcar as well as planning for future streetcar

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 3
extensions located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$237,180
Section 20.017. To the Department of Transportation
For multimodal infrastructure improvements for a public port authority
in excess of 100 acres located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$21,646,419
Section 20.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For completing HVAC projects for various state department facilities
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$4,204,226
Section 20.031. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a new state office building located in any
city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants, and located in a county with more
than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants, and
with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than
twelve thousand six hundred inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$5,306,465
Section 20.032. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a fleet management office building and
fleet garage in any county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$7,597,451
Section 20.033. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a new statewide warehouse in any county

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 4
with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$4,943,484
Section 20.037. To the Office of Administration
For the expansion of a sports training facility of a nonprofit organization
for athletes with special needs in a city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,000,000
Section 20.039. To the Office of Administration
For the construction and programming costs for an early childhood
career education program in a county with a population of over
thirty-one thousand but no more than thirty-five thousand, with a
county seat of a population over ten thousand but no more than
thirteen thousand, provided that a local match of ten percent be
provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,929,190
Section 20.055. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband cellular towers, with priority to underserved and unserved
locations
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$13,162,379
Section 20.065. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For community development and revitalization, provided that local
match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$33,202,078
Section 20.070. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 5
For grants to political subdivisions, including but not limited to levee
districts, for an Industrial Site Development Program, provided
that local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
For projects one thousand (1,000) or more contiguous acres in size
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$5,943,072
For projects under one thousand (1,000) contiguous acres in size
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 8,444,617
Total .........................................................................................................................$14,387,689
Section 20.090. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For workforce development
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$12,480,330
Section 20.100. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For local tourism development, provided that any grant awards disbursed
from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis
provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient or
local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$11,463,892
Section 20.110. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For renovations, HVAC upgrades, dietary upgrades, construction, and
replacements at the St. James Veterans’ Home
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,132,032
Section 20.111. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For planning, design, construction, renovations, and upgrades at the Cape
Girardeau Veterans’ Home
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,436,214

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 6
Section 20.115. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For compiling, standardizing, and maintaining Geographic Information
System (GIS) data in support of the statewide implementation of
Next Generation 911 (NG911) and enhancements, provided that
local matching funds must be provided on a 90/10 state/local
basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$1,356,668
Section 20.120. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a sub-system addition to the Missouri Statewide Interoperability
Network (MOSWIN), increasing user capacity and portable radio
communication coverage throughout Jefferson City, and
extending into Cole and Callaway Counties
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) .........................................................................................$801,981
Section 20.125. To the Office of Administration
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For expenses of any state agency responding to COVID-19
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$15,580,624
Section 20.135. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the planning, design, construction, and equipping of a crime
laboratory as part of a multi-agency laboratory campus including
building space, laboratory space, fixtures, equipment, systems
furniture, and parking infrastructure
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$31,699,822
Section 20.150. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For grants to emergency medical providers, fire protection entities, or
public safety officers, provided that local matching funds must be
provided

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 7
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$1,832,242
Section 20.165. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For design, renovation, construction, and improvements to become
compliant with Americans with Disabilities Act standards in
cottages and group homes
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ......................................................................................$3,076,959
Section 20.185. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For grants to federally qualified health centers, certified community
behavioral health organizations, and community mental health
centers, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 60/40 state/local basis for
projects under five million dollars ($5,000,000) and a 50/50 basis
by the recipient for projects over five million dollars ($5,000,000)
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$17,858,992
Section 20.197. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the upgrades to outdated MRI & Ultrasound equipment in a hospital
in a city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty thousand
inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must be provided
on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$197,022
Section 20.198. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For surgical equipment for the hospital located in a county with more
than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen
thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than three thousand six hundred but fewer than four
thousand two hundred ten inhabitants

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 8
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$244,710
Section 20.199. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For grants to ambulance services, for equipment, radios, or training,
provided that the maximum award shall be $100,000 per
recipient, and further provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 90/10 state/local basis; and for a statewide
communications and patient movement platform
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) .........................................................................................$100,187
Section 20.205. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For providers of Medicaid services in rural counties for the purchase of
necessary equipment and training for the purpose of increasing
access to telehealth services for MO HealthNet participants
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) .........................................................................................$448,169
Section 20.218. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For Cape Girardeau Career and Technology Center, for equipment and
structural improvements, provided that any grant awards
disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50
basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$611,955
Section 20.310. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For a covered arena and stormwater projects at the Missouri State
Fairgrounds
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$2,120,942
Section 20.314. To the Department of Agriculture

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 9
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new maintenance building at the Missouri State Fair
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$234,063
Section 20.315. To the Department of Agriculture
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
an arena at the Missouri State Fair
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$24,431,662
Section 20.325. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and lead service-line inventories,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) (Not to exceed 11.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................$122,462,604
Section 20.326. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the testing, filtration, and remediation of lead in drinking water
sources within buildings housing early childhood, elementary,
and secondary education programs which receive state funding
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ....................................................................................$17,637,974
Section 20.330. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For state park and historic site water and wastewater improvements
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$9,926,195
Section 20.335. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the Missouri Hydrology Information Center
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$4,825

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 10
Personal Service ..................................................................................................299,355
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,967,152
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ....................................................................................................... 4,266,507
Total (Not to exceed 4.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$4,271,332
Section 20.336. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For maintenance, repair, and capital improvements for sewer updates for
a nursing facility located in any county with more than six
thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than four hundred but fewer than one
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$4,315
Section 20.360. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Conservation
For levee setback and road relocation at Columbia Bottom Conservation
Area
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$9,746,040
Section 20.362. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in a city with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants and that is
the county seat of a county with more than one hundred twenty
thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ................................................................................................................$108,699
Section 20.364. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water and wastewater infrastructure projects in any city with more
than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants, provided

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 11
that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30 state/local
basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ..................................................................................................................$75,071
Section 20.370. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband infrastructure
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) ......................$12,932,954
From Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund (2431) ................................................. 75,936,201
Total .........................................................................................................................$88,869,155
Section 20.371. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For reimbursement to broadband providers, for certain costs incurred for
state broadband projects to remove, install, or replace utility
poles, where such costs are necessary to extend the provider’s
retail broadband services offering speeds of 100/100 Mbps to an
area currently lacking broadband speeds of 25/3 Mbps, excluding
providers that have a pre-existing and enforceable federal or state
funding commitment for the same location, provided fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 20.370
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) ........................$5,126,425
Section 20.375. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband capacity building
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$10,208
Personal Service ..................................................................................................975,905
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,064,012
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) .................. 6,039,917
Total (Not to exceed (Not to exceed 13.00 F.T.E.) ...................................................$6,050,125
Section 20.376. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design and construction of a parking garage located in
a city with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 12
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,787,574
Section 20.378. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design and construction of a community facility located
in a city with more than one thousand nine hundred but fewer
than two thousand one hundred fifty inhabitants and located in a
county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than
twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than one thousand nine hundred but fewer than two
thousand three hundred inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$1,583,470
Section 20.379. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the upgrades and renovations to a theater that is located in a village
with more than fifty-two but fewer than sixty-one inhabitants and
located in a county with more than twenty-two thousand but
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
sixteen thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .........................................................................$11,580
Section 20.381. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For an entertainment district working towards stimulating the growth,
community spirit and entertainment of the district located in any
city with more than four thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county, while promoting the historic character, provided
that no local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 20.390. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety and the Department of the National
Guard
For planning, design, construction and capital improvements to replace
water and sanitation lines, connections to municipal wastewater

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 13
treatment facilities, and establishing water and wastewater
service
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ................................................................................................................$426,659
Section 20.400. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for the installation of additional broadband
capacity within state correctional centers
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Broadband Fund (2465) ...........................$557,060
Section 20.405. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, wastewater
systems, and storm water systems at facilities statewide
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ..................................................................................................................$80,378
Section 20.500. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For distributions to providers of vocational education programs,
provided that twenty-five percent (25%) local matching funds be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$4,515,105
Section 20.505. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For agriculture innovation and workforce program grants to higher
education institutions
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$1,669,617
Section 20.506. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For capital improvements to a facility housing an organization in a city
not within a county which facilitates supplemental education

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 14
programs including education, job development and training, and
community service programs to under-resourced individuals
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$276,083
Section 20.508. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-Columbia for construction, renovation,
and maintenance and repair needs for NextGen
Radiopharmaceuticals, Animal Science, Healthcare,
Engineering, Student Success and directly related academic
assets and infrastructure including related planning, design,
demolition, acquisitions, project management, equipment, and
start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,000,000
Section 20.510. To the Office of Administration
For digital government transformation of the State of Missouri
information technology systems, provided that not more than
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility in F.T.E. is allowed from
this section to Section 5.030 of House Bill No. 2005, as truly
agreed to and finally passed by the 102nd General Assembly,
Second Regular Session
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$79,088
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,866,283
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,795,945
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 10,662,228
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,741,316
Section 20.520. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the purpose of replacing the Missouri Department of Agriculture’s
Grain Regulatory Services licensing system
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$129,144

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 15
Section 20.525. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the purpose of modernizing the Missouri Department of Social
Services' Missouri Automated Child Support System
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$14,660
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,312,534
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,790,383
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 9,102,917
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,117,577
Section 20.560. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For build-out of the Public Safety Broadband Network (PSBN) in
Jefferson City to increase wireless broadband coverage and
capacity in and around the buildings of the Capitol Complex
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$4,550,143
Section 20.570. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For an additional zone controller in order to reduce load and increase
capacity of the Missouri Statewide Interoperability Network
(MOSWIN)
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$486,949
Section 20.572. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For funding of training on proper use-of-force, de-escalation, and
constitutional policing provided by a basic training center or a
continuing law enforcement education training provider licensed
by the Director of Public Safety. Such training shall be made
available to all Missouri law enforcement officers
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$916,399

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 16
Section 20.576. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Department of Public Safety
For the planning, design, and construction of an Aviation Classification
Repair Activity Depot (AVCRAD) aircraft maintenance hangar
addition at an AVCRAD Base in any city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local match be required
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................$3,800,000
Section 20.580. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, and improvements to institutional
security cameras, camera systems, and associated hardware and
software
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,147,760
Section 20.585. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, and improvements to institutional
radios, radio systems, and associated hardware and software
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$73,195
Section 20.600. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
To procure and implement a multi-year, vendor-hosted,
integrated commercial off the shelf electronic health record
system for use in all of the department’s hospitals and facilities
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$12,967,987
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 564,672
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,532,659
Section 20.601. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 17
For the construction of four new Behavioral Health Crisis Centers in
areas of need as determined by the Department of Mental Health
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$60,900
Section 20.610. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the design and construction of a multi-agency health laboratory
campus, including additional building space, laboratory space,
fixtures, equipment, systems furniture, and parking
infrastructure, provided no funds shall be expended to the World
Health Organization
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$22,799,679
Section 20.625. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the development of a case management system
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,140,774
Section 20.643. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For capital improvement projects at a justice center located in a city with
more than fifty-one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county, provided that
any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be
matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$27,195
Section 20.645. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For capital improvement projects at an airport located in a county with
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two
thousand three hundred but fewer than four thousand inhabitants,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation
shall be matched on a 90/10 basis by the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 18
(2464) ................................................................................................................$144,211
Section 20.650. To the Office of Administration
For the Supreme Court
For funding court improvement projects
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$16,725
Section 20.705. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For East Central College for the construction and/or renovation needs for
a Rolla Campus including related planning, design, acquisitions,
project management, equipment and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,250,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 2,573,011
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,823,011
Section 20.720. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Mineral Area College for the construction and/or renovation needs
for a Center for Excellence including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$323,095
Section 20.725. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Moberly Area Community College for a Next Century Networking
project across the five-campus system to include the construction
and/or renovation needs for the network including related
planning, design, acquisitions, project management, equipment,
and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$141,438
Section 20.736. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Ozarks Technical Community College

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 19
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a Center for Workforce
and Student Success, including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,062,395
Section 20.740. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For St. Charles Community College
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a workforce technical
innovation and transformation campus including related
planning, design, acquisitions, project management, equipment,
and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,843,809
Section 20.746. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For St. Louis Community College
For construction and/or renovation needs for education and workforce
training programs for the Wildwood Campus expansion,
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,084,331
Section 20.760. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For State Technical College of Missouri
For the construction and/or renovation needs for multiple technical
programs for overall student capacity expansions including
related planning, design, acquisitions, project management,
equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,065,647
Section 20.765. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For University of Central Missouri
For the deferred maintenance, construction and/or renovation needs for
the Humphreys Building including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 20
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,950,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 1,246,323
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,196,323
Section 20.771. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Southeast Missouri State University
For the demolition, construction, and/or renovation needs for a dual-role,
multi-use, multi-facility comprehensive development, including
related planning, design, acquisitions, project management,
fixtures, equipment, systems furniture, and start-up costs for a
Modern Campus Health Sciences Building
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$37,000,000
Section 20.775. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a Center for
Transformational Education for Life, Physical, and Health
Sciences including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,379,572
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 1,515,216
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,894,788
Section 20.776. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri State University
For the demolition, construction and/or renovation needs for the Judith
Enyeart Reynolds Complex, including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation
shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$12,875,029

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 21
Section 20.780. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Lincoln University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for health sciences and
crisis center including related planning design, acquisitions,
project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 2,900,076
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,900,076
Section 20.785. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Truman State University
For the demolition of McKinney Center and the construction and/or
renovation needs for the Kirk Student Access and Success Center
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$770,074
Section 20.790. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Northwest Missouri State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for Martindale Hall and
related health and allied sciences education program expansions
and campus renovations including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation
shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient for project costs
up to sixty million ($60,000,000); and further provided project
costs over sixty million ($60,000,000) shall be matched on a
25/75 basis by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$1,185,892
Section 20.791. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Northwest Missouri State University

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 22
For the construction and/or renovation needs for an Energy Infrastructure
Modernization project including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$21,944,595
Section 20.801. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri Western State University
For construction and/or renovation needs for the student success hub at
the Hearnes Center including related planning, design, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$94,330
Section 20.805. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Harris-Stowe State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a STEM Academic
Building including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management,
equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,750,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ................................................................................ 18,690,046
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,440,046
Section 20.820. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri University of Science and Technology
For the construction and/or renovation needs for Missouri Protoplex
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment and start-up costs, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis by the recipient for project costs up to sixty
million ($60,000,000); and further provided project costs over
sixty million ($60,000,000) shall be matched on a 25/75 basis by
the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$6,152,873

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 23
Section 20.821. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri
For the construction and/or renovation of an Advancing Missouri’s
STEM Education and Workforce Development, including related
planning, design, acquisitions, project management, equipment,
and start-up costs located at the Missouri University of Science
and Technology
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$23,524,296
Section 20.822. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the planning, design, and construction of an engineering building at
the University of Missouri - St. Louis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$12,877,801
Section 20.830. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-St. Louis
For the demolition, construction and/or renovation needs for a Campus
of the Future through a multi-facility comprehensive effort
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$14,045,279
Section 20.833. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For providing a matching grant to a county with more than one million
inhabitants to establish a regional intelligence and information
center, a property control facility, and a training facility and range
for law enforcement, provided that any grant award disbursed
from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis
provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient or
local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$767,994

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 24
Section 20.834. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture and Small Business Development Authority, for
biofuel infrastructure projects
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,785,455
Section 20.836. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For the acquisition, construction, maintenance, repair and/or renovation
of a building to provide advanced workforce development for a
school district located in any city with more than four thousand
four hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one hundred
thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants for a technical school, provided that
no local match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ...........................................................................................................$10,312,507
Section 20.840. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the construction of a building that will provide a regional training
facility for law enforcement and fire department personnel,
located in any city with more than three thousand but fewer than
three thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than three thousand but fewer than three thousand
six hundred inhabitants, provided no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$66,794
Section 20.841. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 25
For airport repairs and improvements, located in any city with more than
three thousand but fewer than three thousand four hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
thousand but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$259,665
Section 20.843. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction for a library
located in any city with more than six thousand three hundred but
fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and located in a county
with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than two
hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................$58,265
Section 20.848. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of an agency that
connects job seekers to training programs and employment,
helping employers diversify their workforce, and assisting youth
with career skills located in any county with more than one
million inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in
order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$3,651,910
Section 20.849. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of an Amtrak
Station located in any city with more than three thousand four
hundred but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 26
and located in a county with more than eight thousand but fewer
than eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than three thousand three hundred but fewer than
five thousand inhabitants, provided no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$953,455
Section 20.852. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the maintenance and improvements of a park and sports complex
located on approximately one hundred twenty-seven acres in any
city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than
two hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,105,705
Section 20.857. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the purpose of removing condemned city-owned, vacant properties
in any city not within a county, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$8,743,528
Section 20.864. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For maintenance and improvements for county jails, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the
recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$2,164,491
Section 20.865. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the purchase of services, equipment, or supplies for a nonprofit
organization located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county to help

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 27
reduce community victimization and strengthen police services
through violence reduction strategies and provided that a local
match, to include personnel costs associated with project
initiatives, to be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .......................................................................................................................$707
Section 20.873. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For maintenance, repairs, expansion and improvements for the official
Korean War veteran’s memorial located in any city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$561,604
Section 20.881. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For distribution to any county with more than four hundred thousand but
fewer than five hundred thousand inhabitants, for storm water
mitigation and remediation, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ................................................................................................................$188,047
Section 20.886. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For upgrades and maintenance to sewer systems located in any city with
more than ninety-five thousand but fewer than one hundred five
thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) .............................................................................................................$4,587,642
Section 20.891. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 28
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than eleven thousand but fewer than twelve thousand five
hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462) ................................................................................................................$900,000
Section 20.900. To the Office of Administration
For administration of programs appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$17,339
Personal Service
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ........................................................................................1,197,116
For the Department of Natural Resources administration of programs
appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................4,704
Personal Service ..................................................................................................437,333
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 199,831
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ..................................................................................................................637,164
For the Department of Economic Development administration of
programs appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................17,082
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,560,890
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 230,178
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ........................................................................................1,791,068
For the Department of Public Safety administration of programs
appropriated herein

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 29
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..................................................................................2,020
Personal Service ..................................................................................................202,022
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 42,022
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ....................................................................................................... 244,044
Total (Not to exceed 42.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,910,537
Section 20.905. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds ...................................................$150,000,000
Section 20.906. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) ..................................................................................$230,000,000
Section 20.910. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For a capital subsidy for eligible transit agencies supporting the
transportation of the elderly, individuals with disabilities, and
low-income individuals
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .............................................................................................................$3,588,165
Section 20.912. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, design, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation and repair of I-35, I-29, and U.S.
169 in Clay, Jackson, and Platte counties, matched by federal
funds
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$29,694,836
Section 20.930. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 30
For the Division of Plant Industries
For renovations and improvements to the Feed Control Laboratory
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) ................................................................................................................$258,853
Section 20.980. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For Highway Patrol aircraft maintenance and training
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$94,978
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 94,978
Total ..............................................................................................................................$189,956
Section 20.992. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a grant to a nonprofit organization serving multiple counties, at least
one of which is a county with more than one million inhabitants
for the construction of a regional police training facility
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$50,000,000
Section 20.994. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a grant program to upgrade the streetlights in a city with more than
twenty thousand but fewer than twenty-three thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than two hundred
thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$300,000
Section 20.997. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For distribution to a county with more than seventeen thousand six
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than ten
thousand inhabitants, for the planning, design, and construction
of a veterans' memorial, provided that local matching funds must
be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$3,500,000
Section 20.1020. To the Office of Administration

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 31
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the purpose of maintenance and repairs at a water treatment plant
located in any city with more than two thousand seven hundred
but fewer than three thousand inhabitants and located in a county
with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than five thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463) .........................................................................................$373,206
Section 20.1028. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For distributions to the free public schools of $4,689,311,449 in total
from this section and Section 2.015 of House Bill No. 2002, as
truly agreed to and finally passed by the 103rd General
Assembly, Second Regular Session, under the School Foundation
Program as provided in Chapter 163, RSMo, provided that no
funds are used to support the distribution or sharing of any
individually identifiable student data for non-educational
purposes, marketing or advertising, as follows:
For the Foundation Formula
Program Distribution
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464) .........................................................................................................$150,000,000
Section 20.1029. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For distributions to the free public schools of $4,689,311,449 in total
from this section and Section 2.015 of House Bill No. 2002, as
truly agreed to and finally passed by the 103rd General
Assembly, Second Regular Session, under the School Foundation
Program as provided in Chapter 163, RSMo, provided that no
funds are used to support the distribution or sharing of any
individually identifiable student data for non-educational
purposes, marketing or advertising, and further provided that
these funds from this section shall not supplant general revenue
funds in Section 2.015 of House Bill No. 2002, as truly agreed to
and finally passed by the 103rd General Assembly, Second

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 32
Regular Session, under the School Foundation Program as
provided in Chapter 163, RSMo, as follows:
For the Foundation Formula
Program Distribution
From Blind Pension Fund (1621) ............................................................................$27,000,000
Section 20.1090. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, design, and
construction of infrastructure improvements on Highway 76 in a
city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more
than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer than
four thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ....................................................................$4,168,345
Section 20.1121. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in any county with more than thirty
thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
thirteen thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$750,000
Section 20.1178. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For a nonprofit corporation focused on greater downtown community
development in a city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county established by a
membership organization representing business, nonprofit
organizations, and other investors for the purpose of undertaking
community development projects
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) ..................................................................$15,000,000
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (0.00 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$209,891,371
Federal Funds (70.00 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................925,377,834

SS SCS HCS HB 2020 33
Other Funds (0.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................... 36,841,018
Total (70.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................................$1,172,110,223
